Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202585-2611
First responder; tuition waiver; conditions; application.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a first responder shall be entitled to a tuition waiver as provided in section 85-2620 from any state university, state college, or community college for an associate or baccalaureate degree program if the first responder:

(a) Satisfies the relevant requirements of section 85-2612;

(b) Meets all admission requirements of the state university, state college, or community college;

(c) Pursues studies leading to a qualifying degree from an associate degree program or a baccalaureate degree program;

(d) Submits the certificate of verification required by subsection (2) of this section; and

(e) Files with the Department of Revenue documentation showing proof of employment as a first responder and proof of residence in Nebraska each year such first responder applies for and receives the tuition waiver.

(2) An application for the tuition waiver shall include a certificate of verification from the first responder's superior officer attesting to such first responder's satisfaction of section 85-2612. The first responder shall include the certificate of verification when applying to the state university, state college, or community college in order to obtain tuition waiver upon initial enrollment.

(3) For a first responder who is a correctional officer or a youth detention officer, the tuition waiver shall only be available beginning July 1, 2027, and shall only be available for attendance at a state university.

Laws 2025, LB608, § 4.